Illinois, session 104th, SB4109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 7Public Health for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:8Payable from the General Revenue Fund:9  For Personal Services............................94,955,80010  For State Contributions11   to Social Security...............................7,260,70012  For Operational Expenses.........................36,437,20013    Total                                        $138,653,70014DIRECTOR'S OFFICE15Payable from the General Revenue Fund:16  For Costs and Administrative Expenses17   Associated with the Data Governance18   and Organization to Support19   Equity and Racial Justice Act20   Data Initiative....................................400,00021  For All Costs Associated with Data22   System Modernization and23   Replacement of Critical Information  SB4109- 2 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Technology Systems .............................12,000,0002  For All Costs Associated with Responding3   to Emerging Public Health Threats,4   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................8,500,0005  For All Costs Associated with6   Public Health Communications,7   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................3,500,0008  For Expenses Related to Refugee Health............1,000,0009  For Expenses Related to the10   Homelessness Morbidity and11   Mortality Report...................................400,00012  For Grants and administrative Expenses 13   to Establish and Implement Health 14   Equity Zones......................................500,000 15    Total                                         $26,300,00016Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:17  For Expenses of Implementing Federal Awards18   Including Testing and Services Performed by19   Local Health Providers, Including Prior20   Years' Costs....................................75,000,00021  For Expenses Associated with22   Support of Federally Funded Public23   Health Programs....................................300,00024  For Operational Expenses to Support25   Refugee Health Care................................514,00026  For Grants for the Development of  SB4109- 3 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Refugee Health Care..............................1,950,0002    Total                                         $77,764,0003Payable from the Public Health Special 4 State Projects Fund:5  For Expenses of Public Health Programs, Including6   Prior Years' Costs..............................49,065,000 7    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 8thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 9Department of Public Health as follows:10REFUNDS11Payable from the General Revenue Fund..................13,80012Payable from the Public Health Services Fund...........75,00013Payable from the Maternal and Child 14 Health Services Block Grant Fund.......................5,00015Payable from the Preventive Health and 16 Health Services Block Grant Fund.......................5,00017    Total                                             $98,800 18    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 20Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 21hereinafter named:22OFFICE OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION23Payable from the Metabolic Screening 24  and Treatment Fund:  SB4109- 4 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1  For Operational Expenses for Maintaining2   Laboratory Billings and Receivables................300,0003Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:4  For Expenses Associated with the 5   Modernization of Financial Processes...............500,000 6    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 9hereinafter named:10OFFICE OF POLICY, PLANNING AND STATISTICS11Payable from the General Revenue Fund:12  For Expenses of the Adverse Pregnancy13   Outcomes Reporting Systems (APORS) Program14   and the Adverse Health Care Event15   Reporting and Patient Safety Initiative..........1,017,40016  For Expenses of State Cancer Registry,17   Including Matching Funds for National18   Cancer Institute Grants............................147,40019  For Expenses Associated with Opioid20   Overdose Prevention..............................1,625,00021  For All Costs Associated with Access 22   to Primary Health Care Services Programs 23   According to the Underserved Physician 24   Workforce Act....................................1,000,00025  For Grants and Administrative Expenses  SB4109- 5 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Associated with the Equity and 2   Representation in Health Care Act Health 3   Care Work Force Repayment and 4   Scholarship Programs.............................1,500,0005Payable from the Rural/Downstate Health Access Fund:6  For Expenses Related to J-1 Visa Waiver 7   Applications.......................................175,0008Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:9  For All Costs Associated with10   Policy, Planning, and Statistics11   Programs, Including Prior Years' Costs..........35,632,20012Payable from the Hospital Licensure Fund:13  For Expenses Associated with 14   the Illinois Adverse Health15   Care Events Reporting Law for an16   Adverse Health Care Event Reporting System17   and Patient Safety and Quality Initiatives.......3,000,00018Payable from Community Health Center Care Fund:19  For Expenses for Access to Primary Health20   Care Services Program per the Underserved Health21   Care Provider Workforce Act........................350,00022Payable from Illinois Health Facilities Planning Fund:23  For Expenses of the Health Facilities24   And Services Review Board........................1,600,00025  For Department Expenses in Support26   of the Health Facilities and Services  SB4109- 6 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Review Board.....................................1,200,0002Payable from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund:3  For Expenses of Identified Offenders4   Assessment and Other Public Health and5   Safety Activities................................2,000,0006Payable from the Regulatory Evaluation and Basic 7 Enforcement Fund:8  For Expenses of the Alternative Health Care9   Delivery Systems Program............................75,00010Payable from Death Certificate 11 Surcharge Fund:12  For Expenses of Statewide Database13   of Death Certificates and Distributions14   of Funds to Governmental Units,15   Pursuant to the Vital Records Act................2,500,00016  For Expenses of the Coroner Training Board..........500,00017Payable from the Illinois Adoption Registry 18 and Medical Information Exchange Fund:19  For Expenses Associated with the20   Adoption Registry and Medical Information21   Exchange...........................................200,00022Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:23  For Costs Associated with the Modernization24   of the iQuery System...............................300,00025  For Grants for the Community Health Center26   Expansion Program and Healthcare  SB4109- 7 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Workforce Providers in Health2   Professional Shortage Areas (HPSAs)3   in Illinois......................................1,100,0004Payable from the Preventive Health and Health 5 Services Block Grant Fund:6  For Expenses of Preventive Health and Health7   Services Needs Assessment........................3,500,0008Payable from Illinois State Podiatric Disciplinary Fund:9  For Expenses of the Podiatric Scholarship10   and Residency Act..................................100,000 11    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 13Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 14hereinafter named:15OFFICE OF HEALTH PROMOTION16Payable from the General Revenue Fund:17  For Expenses of Sudden Infant Death Services Inc.18   of IL(SIDS) Program................................244,40019  For Expenses Related to an Alzheimer's20   Disease Research, Care and Support Program.......2,000,00021  For Expenses Related to a Suicide Prevention,22   Education, and Treatment Program...................750,00023  For All Costs Associated with the Community24   Health Worker Program............................2,000,00025  For Expenses for the University of  SB4109- 8 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Illinois Sickle Cell Clinic........................483,9002  For a grant to the National Kidney3   Foundation of Illinois for Kidney Disease4   Care Services......................................350,0005  For Grants to Northwestern University6   for the Illinois Violent Death Reporting7   System to Analyze Data, Identify Risk8   Factors and Develop Prevention Efforts..............76,7009  For a Grant to the Advocate Illinois10   Masonic Medical Center for All Costs11   Associated with Mobile Dental Services.............375,00012  For Grants for Vision and Hearing13   Screening Programs.................................441,70014  For a Grant to the Oral Health Forum15   for All Costs Associated with16   Oral Health Programs...............................100,00017  For Grants and Administrative Costs Associated18   with Health Care Telementoring...................2,000,00019  For a Grant to the Dental Lifeline Network 20   to Provide Dental Care and Education................72,00021Payable from the Alzheimer's Disease Research,22   Care, and Support Fund:23  For Grants and Expenses Pursuant to the Alzheimer's24   Disease Research, Care, and Support Fund Act.......500,00025Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:26  For All Costs Associated With  SB4109- 9 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Health Promotion programs,2   Including Prior Years' Costs ...................13,204,4003Payable from the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund:4  For Expenses of the Medical 5   Cannabis Program.................................9,522,6006Payable from the Childhood Cancer Research Fund:7  For Grants and Administrative Expenses8  for Childhood Cancer Research........................75,0009Payable from the Sickle Cell Chronic Disease Fund:10  For Grants and Administrative Costs for the11   Awareness, Prevention, Care, and Treatment12   of Sickle Cell Disease...........................1,000,00013Payable from the Multiple Sclerosis Research Fund:14  For Grants to Conduct Multiple15   Sclerosis Research...............................1,500,00016Payable from the Healthy Smiles Fund:17  For Expenses of the Healthy Smiles Program..........400,00018Payable from the DHS Private Resources Fund:19  For Expenses of Diabetes Research Treatment20   and Programs.......................................700,00021Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:22  For All Costs Associated with23   Asthma Prevention................................3,000,00024  For Colorectal, Prostate, and 25   Lung Cancer Grants...............................2,000,00026  For a State tobacco control program...............5,000,000  SB4109- 10 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1  For Certified Local Health Department2   Grants for Health Protection Programs Including,3   but not Limited to, Infectious4   Diseases, Food Sanitation,5   Potable Water, Private Sewage6   and Anti-Smoking Programs........................5,000,0007  For a Grant to the American Lung Association8   for Operations of the Quitline...................5,100,0009  For Grants and Administrative Expenses for10   the Tobacco Use Prevention Program,11   BASUAH Program, and Asthma Prevention............1,060,00012Payable from the Public Health Federal Projects Fund:13  For expenses related to the Community Health14   Worker Certification and Reimbursement Act15   and for Purposes Stated in Public Act 102-4......1,500,00016Payable from the Maternal and Child17  Health Services Block Grant Fund:18  For Operational Expenses of Maternal and19   Child Health Programs..............................500,00020  For Grants for Maternal and Child Health21   Programs...........................................995,00022Payable from the Preventive Health23  and Health Services Block Grant Fund:24  For Expenses of Preventive Health and25   Health Services Programs.........................1,726,80026  For Grants for Prevention Initiative Programs  SB4109- 11 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Including Operational Expenses...................1,000,0002Payable from the Cannabis Regulation Fund:3  For Costs and Administrative Expenses4   of the Adult-Use Cannabis Program................1,500,0005Payable from the Metabolic Screening and 6 Treatment Fund:7  For All Costs Associated with Metabolic8   Screening Follow-up Services.....................8,500,0009  For Grants for Metabolic Screening10   Follow-up Services...............................4,000,00011  For Grants for Free Distribution of Medical12   Preparations and Food Supplies...................8,000,00013Payable from the Hearing Instrument 14 Dispenser Examining and Disciplinary Fund:15  For Expenses Pursuant to the Hearing16   Instrument Consumer Protection Act.................400,000 17    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 20hereinafter named:21OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE REGULATION22Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:23  For All Costs Associated with Health24   Care Regulation, Surveillance, and25   Monitoring, Including Prior Years' Costs........25,248,200  SB4109- 12 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Payable from the Hospital Licensure Fund:2  For Expenses Associated with3  Hospital Inspections................................900,0004Payable from the Long Term Care 5 Monitor/Receiver Fund:6  For Expenses, Including Refunds,7   Related to Appointment of Long-Term Care8   Monitors and Receivers..........................54,950,0009Payable from the Home Care Services Agency 10 Licensure Fund:11  For Expenses of Home Care Services12   Agency Licensure.................................1,846,40013Payable from Equity in Long-term Care 14 Quality Fund:15  For Grants and Administrative Expenses16   to Assist Residents of Facilities Licensed Under the 17   Nursing Home Care Act...........................12,000,00018Payable from the Regulatory Evaluation 19 and Basic Enforcement Fund:20  For Expenses of the Alternative Health21   Care Delivery Systems Program.......................75,00022Payable from the Health Facility Plan 23 Review Fund:24  For Expenses of Health Facility25   Plan Review Program and Hospital26   Network System, Including Refunds................1,727,000  SB4109- 13 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Payable from Assisted Living and Shared 2 Housing Regulatory Fund:3  For Operational Expenses of the4   Assisted Living and Shared5   Housing Program, Pursuant to6   the Assisted Living and Shared7   Housing Act......................................3,300,000 8    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 9thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 10Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 11hereinafter named:12OFFICE OF HEALTH PROTECTION13Payable from the General Revenue Fund:14  For Expenses Incurred for the Rapid15   Investigation and Control of16   Disease or Injury..................................448,50017  For Expenses of Environmental Health18   Surveillance and Prevention19   Activities, Including Mercury20   Hazards and West Nile Virus........................299,20021  For Expenses for Expanded Lab Capacity22   and Enhanced Statewide Communication23   Capabilities Associated with24   Homeland Security..................................322,60025  For Deposit into Lead Poisoning  SB4109- 14 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Screening, Prevention, and Abatement2   Fund.............................................4,000,0003  For Grants for Immunizations and4   Outreach Activities..............................4,157,1005  For a Grant to the Will County Public Health6   Department for All Costs Associated with7   Programmatic Services..............................335,0008Payable from the Food and Drug Safety Fund:9  For Expenses of Administering10   the Food and Drug Safety11   Program, Including Refunds.........................300,00012Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:13  For Expenses of Implementing Federal14   Awards, Including Services Performed by15   Local Health Providers, Including Prior16   Years' Costs....................................55,449,80017  For Expenses of Implementing Federal Awards18   Including Testing and Services Performed by19   Local Health Providers, Including Prior20   Years' Costs...................................200,000,00021    Total                                        $255,449,80022Payable from the Safe Bottled Water Fund:23  For Expenses for the Safe Bottled24   Water Program.......................................50,00025Payable from the Facility Licensing Fund:26  For Expenses, Including Refunds, of  SB4109- 15 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Environmental Health Programs....................3,500,0002Payable from the Illinois School Asbestos 3 Abatement Fund:4  For Expenses, Including Refunds, of5   Administering and Executing6   the Asbestos Abatement Act and7   the Federal Asbestos Hazard Emergency8   Response Act of 1986 (AHERA).....................1,200,0009Payable from the Emergency Public Health Fund:10  For Expenses of Mosquito Abatement in an11   Effort to Curb the Spread of West12   Nile Virus and Other Vector Borne Diseases.......5,100,00013Payable from the Public Health Water Permit Fund:14  For Expenses, Including Refunds,15   of Administering the Illinois Groundwater16   Protection Act.....................................100,00017Payable from the Used Tire Management Fund:18  For Expenses of Vector Control Programs,19   Including Mosquito Abatement.....................1,300,00020Payable from the Tattoo and Body Piercing 21 Establishment Registration Fund:22  For Expenses of Administering of23   Tattoo and Body Piercing Establishment24   Registration Program...............................605,00025Payable from the Lead Poisoning Screening, 26 Prevention, and Abatement Fund:  SB4109- 16 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1  For Expenses of the Lead Poisoning2   Screening, Prevention, and3   Abatement Program, Including Refunds.............8,414,6004  For Grants for the Lead Poisoning Screening5   and Prevention Program...........................5,500,0006Payable from the Tanning Facility Permit Fund:7  For Expenses to Administer the8   Tanning Facility Permit Act,9   Including Refunds..................................300,00010Payable from the Plumbing Licensure 11 and Program Fund:12  For Expenses to Administer and Enforce13   the Illinois Plumbing License Law,14   Including Refunds................................3,950,00015Payable from the Renewable Energy 16 Resources Trust Fund:17  For Deposit into the Lead Poisoning, Screening,18  Prevention, and Abatement Fund....................4,000,00019Payable from the Pesticide Control Fund:20  For Public Education, Research,21   and Enforcement of the Structural22   Pest Control Act...................................577,70023Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:24  For Grants and Administrative Expenses25   Associated with a Pilot Project for26   Community-Based Tuberculosis Prevention,  SB4109- 17 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Follow-up, and Treatment...........................500,0002Payable from the Private Sewage Disposal 3 Program Fund:4  For Expenses of Administering the5   Private Sewage Disposal Program....................292,0006Payable from the Personal Property Tax7  Replacement Fund:8  For Local Health Protection Grants9   to Certified Local Health Departments10   for Health Protection Programs Including,11   but not Limited to, Infectious12   Diseases, Food Sanitation,13   Potable Water and Private Sewage................20,098,50014Payable from the Public Health Federal 15 Projects Fund:16  For Grants and Administrative Expenses17   of Health Information Technology Activities18   and Electronic Health Records....................1,500,000 19    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 20thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 21Department of Public Health for expenses of programs related 22to Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and Human 23Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV):24OFFICE OF HEALTH PROTECTION: AIDS/HIV25No less than one-half (50%) of all funds appropriated in any   SB4109- 18 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1fiscal year to the Department of Public Health's Office of 2Health Protection: AIDS/HIV Division shall be used for 3expenses pursuant to HIV/AIDS programs serving populations 4disproportionately impacted by HIV/AIDS.5Payable from the General Revenue Fund:6  For Expenses of AIDS/HIV Education,7   Drugs, Services, Counseling, Testing,8   Outreach to Populations disproportionately impacted 9   by HIV/AIDS; Costs Associated with10   Correctional Facilities Counseling,11   Testing Referral, and Partner Notification12   (CTRPN); and Patient and Worker13   Notification....................................25,562,40014  For Grants and Administrative Expenses for15   Housing Opportunities for Persons with16   AIDS Program.......................................720,00017Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:18  For Expenses of Programs for Prevention19   of AIDS/HIV, Including Prior years' Costs........7,250,00020  For Expenses for Surveillance Programs and21   Seroprevalence Studies22   of AIDS/HIV, Including23   Prior Years' Costs...............................2,750,00024  For Expenses Associated with the25   Ryan White Comprehensive AIDS26   Resource Emergency Act of  SB4109- 19 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   1990 (CARE) and Other AIDS/HIV Services,2   Including Prior Years' Costs...................150,000,0003    Total                                        $160,000,0004Payable from the Quality of Life Endowment Fund:5  For Grants and Expenses Associated6   with HIV/AIDS Prevention and Education...........1,000,000 7    Section 45. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Department of Public Health for grants and 10administrative expenses and related subgrantee payments for 11the prevention and treatment of HIV/AIDS and the creation of 12an HIV/AIDS service delivery system to reduce the disparity of 13HIV infection and AIDS cases among the Illinois population, in 14the approximate amounts below:15Alliance Care 360.....................................333,30016Christian Community HC................................333,30017Community Wellness Project............................333,30018Fola Community Action Services, Inc...................333,30019Men and Women In Prison Ministries....................333,30020Proactive.............................................333,30021Sisters Helping Each Other............................333,30022South Side Help Center................................333,30023Springfield Urban League..............................333,30024Taskforce Prevention & Community Services.............333,30025Universal Family Connection...........................333,300  SB4109- 20 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Writers, Planners and Trainers........................333,300 2    Section 50. The sum of $7,880,500, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the African-American 4HIV/AIDS Response Fund to the Department of Public Health for 5grants and administrative expenses associated with the 6prevention and treatment of HIV/AIDS and the creation of an 7HIV/AIDS service delivery system to reduce the disparity of 8HIV infection and AIDS cases among disproportionately impacted 9by HIV/AIDS in the approximate amounts below, including prior 10years' costs:11Alliance Care 360...................................2,309,60012Christian Community HC..............................1,027,40013Community Wellness Project............................983,40014Fola Community Action Services, Inc...................176,30015Men and Women In Prison Ministries....................383,20016Proactive.............................................412,30017Sisters Helping Each Other............................276,10018South Side Help Center..............................1,269,60019Springfield Urban League..............................104,60020Taskforce Prevention & Community Services.............117,60021Universal Family Connection...........................453,30022Writers, Planners and Trainers........................367,100 23    Section 55. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 24may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Public   SB4109- 21 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Health from the General Revenue Fund for expenses of programs 2related to the Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and 3Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) and specifically to the 4Getting to Zero-Illinois (GTZ) plan to end the HIV epidemic by 52030. 6    Section 60. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 9hereinafter named:10PUBLIC HEALTH LABORATORIES11Payable from the General Revenue Fund:12  For Operational Expenses to Provide13   Clinical and Environmental Public14   Health Laboratory Services.......................6,389,30015Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:16  For All Costs Associated with17   Public Health Laboratories,18   Including Prior Years' Costs ....................8,268,90019Payable from the Public Health Laboratory 20 Services Revolving Fund:21  For Expenses, Including22   Refunds, to Administer Public23   Health Laboratory Programs and24   Services.........................................6,000,00025Payable from the Lead Poisoning   SB4109- 22 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1 Screening, Prevention, and Abatement Fund:2  For Expenses, Including3   Refunds, of Lead Poisoning Screening,4   Prevention, and Abatement Program................2,178,1005Payable from the Metabolic Screening 6 and Treatment Fund:7  For Expenses, Including8   Refunds, of Testing and Screening9   for Metabolic Diseases..........................43,632,000 10    Section 65. The following named amounts, or as much 11thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 12Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 13hereinafter named:14OFFICE OF WOMEN'S HEALTH15Payable from the General Revenue Fund:16  For Expenses for Breast and Cervical17   Cancer Screenings, Minority Outreach,18   and Other Related Activities....................14,512,40019  For Expenses of the Women's Health20   Promotion Programs.................................682,50021  For Expenses associated with School Health 22   Centers..........................................4,551,10023  For Expenses associated with the Maternal 24   And Child Health Title V Program.................4,800,00025  For All Costs Associated with Pediatric  SB4109- 23 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1   Mental Health Training...........................2,000,0002  For Expenses Related to Establishing3   a Reproductive Health Navigation4   Hotline, Training Programs, and5   Consultation Program, Security Grants to 6   Free Standing Reproductive Health Care7   Clinics, and for Purposes Stated8   in Public Act 102-1117..........................18,000,0009  For Grants for the Extension and Provision10   of Perinatal Services for Premature11   and High-Risk Infants and their Mothers..........1,002,70012  For Grants and Administrative Expenses13   for Family Planning Programs.....................5,823,40014    Total                                         $51,372,10015Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:16  For Expenses of Federally Funded Women's17   Health Programs, Including Prior18   Years' Costs.....................................5,570,80019  For Expenses associated with Maternal and20   Child Health Programs, Including Prior21   Years' Costs....................................15,000,00022  For Grants for Breast and Cervical23   Cancer Screenings, Including24   Prior Years' Costs...............................7,000,00025Payable from the Carolyn Adams Ticket 26 For The Cure Grant Fund:  SB4109- 24 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1  For Grants and Related Expenses to2   Public or Private Entities in Illinois3   for the Purpose of Funding Research4   Concerning Breast Cancer and for5   Funding Services for Breast Cancer Victims.......4,000,0006Payable from the Mammogram Fund:7  For Grants and Administrative Expenses of8   Patient Navigation Services........................117,0009Payable from Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:10  For Costs Associated with11   Children's Health Programs.......................2,229,70012Payable from the Maternal and Child Health 13 Services Block Grant Fund:14  For Expenses Associated with Maternal and15   Child Health Programs, Including16   Prior Years' Costs..............................12,000,00017  For Grants to the Chicago Department of18   Health for Maternal and Child Health19   Services.........................................6,000,00020  For Expenses incurred by the Board of21   Trustees of the University of Illinois22   Division of Specialized Care for Children,23   Including Prior Years' Costs....................10,000,00024  For Grants for the Extension and Provision25   of Perinatal Services for Premature and26   High-risk Infants and their Mothers..............3,000,000   SB4109- 25 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1    Section 70. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Department of Public Health for grants and 4administrative expenses associated with the Birth Equity 5Initiative, including, but not limited to support and capacity 6building for community-based women's health providers, the 7development of an inventory of need and assets, an 8implementation plan to increase equitable access to 9community-based health providers, and the design of health 10navigation tools. 11    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 13Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 14hereinafter named:15OFFICE OF PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE16Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:17  For Expenses of Federally Funded18   Bioterrorism Preparedness19   Activities and Other Public Health20   Emergency Preparedness,21   Including Prior Years' Costs....................80,000,00022Payable from the Stroke Data Collection Fund:23  For Expenses Associated with24   Stroke Data Collection.............................400,000  SB4109- 26 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Payable from the Trauma Center Fund:2  For Expenses of Administering the3   Distribution of Payments to4   Trauma Centers...................................2,000,0005Payable from the EMS Assistance Fund:6  For Expenses of Administering the7   Distribution of Payments from the8   EMS Assistance Fund, Including Refunds...........1,000,0009Payable from the Spinal Cord Injury Paralysis 10 Cure Research Trust Fund:11  For Grants for Spinal Cord Injury Research..........500,000 12ARTICLE 213    Section 5. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 15on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 16in Article 122, Section 1155 of Public Act 104-0003, as 17amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future 18to the Department of Public Health for a grant to the Will 19County Health Department for costs associated with an overdose 20prevention program, including FDA-approved 8-milligram 21naloxone nasal spray doses, and associated operating expenses, 22including prior years' costs. 23    Section 10. The sum of $2,554,571, or so much thereof as   SB4109- 27 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 2business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for 3such purpose in Article 122, Section 1160 of Public Act 4104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 5Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for a 6grant to Carle Health Methodist Hospital for costs associated 7with its Job Readiness, Learning Program, and related 8operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 15. The sum of $399,290, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 11on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 12in Article 122, Section 1165 of Public Act 104-0003, as 13amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future 14to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Carle Health 15Methodist Hospital for costs associated with its Healthy 16Beginnings Program, and related expenses, including prior 17years' costs. 18    Section 20. The sum of $2,093,618, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 20business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for 21such purpose in Article 122, Section 1175 of Public Act 22104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 23Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for 24expenses related to a safe gun storage public awareness   SB4109- 28 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1campaign, including prior years' costs. 2    Section 25. The sum of $530,512, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 4on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 5in Article 122, Section 1180 of Public Act 104-0003, as 6amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future 7to the Department of Public Health for grants and 8administrative expenses for the distribution of PREP 9Medication Access, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 30. The sum of $28,279, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 12on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 13in Article 122, Section 1185 of Public Act 104-0003, as 14amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future 15to the Department of Public Health for grants to certified 16Local Health Departments for Health Protection Programs 17including, but not limited to, infectious diseases, food 18sanitation, potable water and private sewage, and related 19expenses, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 35. The sum of $50,438, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 22on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 23in Article 122, Section 1190 of Public Act 104-0003, as   SB4109- 29 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future 2to the Department of Public Health for grants and 3administrative expenses associated with STI screenings, 4including prior years' costs. 5    Section 40. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 8in Article 122, Section 1195, of Public Act 104-0003, as 9amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future 10to the Department of Public Health for a grant to the Lake 11County Children's Advocacy Center. 12    Section 45. The sum of $14,705,900, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation made for such 15purpose in Article 122, Section 1235, of Public Act 104-0003, 16as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 17Future to the Department of Public Health for making payments 18in support of the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 19following safety net hospitals to improve health equity, 20improve access to quality care, and reduce health disparities 21in underserved communities and that participate in the State's 22Medicaid managed care program at the following named amounts:23SAFETY NET24  Insight-Chicago...................................7,000,000  SB4109- 30 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1  Jackson Park-Chicago..............................7,000,0002  Loretto-Chicago..................................11,000,0003  Mount Sinai-Chicago..............................13,000,0004  Roseland-Chicago.................................16,000,0005  South Shore-Chicago..............................17,000,0006  St. Bernard-Chicago...............................7,000,0007  Thorek Andersonville-Chicago......................2,000,0008  Thorek Memorial...................................2,000,0009  Touchette-Centreville............................12,000,00010  West Suburban-Oak Park............................4,000,00011  Weiss-Chicago.....................................4,000,000 12    Section 50. The sum of $6,000,000, that was appropriated 13to the Department of Public Health from the General Revenue 14Fund for the purpose of administering the Breakthrough 15Therapies for Veteran Suicide Prevention Program. The entire 16sum of $3,000,000 in program funding shall be a direct grant to 17Sunstone Therapies to administer the program in collaboration 18with an Illinois-based mental healthcare provider, including 19but not limited to conducting clinical research on emerging 20therapies for veteran suicide prevention in State Fiscal Year 212026 by Article 63, Section 105 of Public Act 104-0003, as 22amended, or so much thereof remains unexpended at the Close of 23business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the 24Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health 25for the purpose of administering the Breakthrough Therapies   SB4109- 31 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1for Veteran Suicide Prevention Program. The entire sum of 2$3,000,000 in program funding shall be a direct grant to 3Sunstone Therapies to administer the program in collaboration 4with an Illinois-based mental healthcare provider, including 5but not limited to conducting clinical research on emerging 6therapies for veteran suicide prevention 7    Section 55. The sum of $4,500,000, that was appropriated 8to the Department of Public Health from the General Revenue 9Fund for a grant to the Illinois Association of Free and 10Charitable Clinics in State Fiscal Year 2026 by Article 63, 11Section 100 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 12thereof remains unexpended at the Close of business on June 1330, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 14Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to the 15Illinois Association of Free and Charitable Clinics. 16    Section 60. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 18Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to the 19American Lung Association. 20    Section 65. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 22Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to VNA 23Healthcare Kane County for all costs associated with   SB4109- 32 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1healthcare access and availability, administrative costs and 2operational expenses. 3    Section 70. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 5Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to 6Greater Family Health for all costs associated with healthcare 7access and availability, administrative costs and operational 8expenses. 9    Section 75. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 11Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Access 12DuPage for all costs associated with healthcare access and 13availability, administrative costs and operational expenses. 14    Section 80. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 15be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 16Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to VNA 17Healthcare DuPage County for all costs associated with 18healthcare access and availability, administrative costs and 19operational expenses. 20    Section 85. The sum of $600,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 22Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Erie   SB4109- 33 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Family Health for all costs associated with healthcare access 2and availability, administrative costs and operational 3expenses. 4    Section 90. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 6Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Access 7Lake for all costs associated with healthcare access and 8availability, administrative costs and operational expenses. 9    Section 95. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 11Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to 12Rosalind Franklin University Health Clinics for all costs 13associated with healthcare access and availability, 14administrative costs and operational expenses. 15    Section 100. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 17Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Cook 18County Health for all costs associated with healthcare access 19and availability, administrative costs and operational 20expenses. 21    Section 105. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois'   SB4109- 34 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to 2Partners for Our Communities for all costs associated with 3healthcare access and availability, administrative costs and 4operational expenses. 5    Section 110. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 7Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Access 8to Care for all costs associated with healthcare access and 9availability, administrative costs and operational expenses. 10    Section 115. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 12Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to VNA 13Healthcare of Will County for all costs associated with 14healthcare access and availability, administrative costs and 15operational expenses. 16    Section 120. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 18Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to Cass 19County Health Center for all costs associated with healthcare 20access and availability, administrative costs and operational 21expenses. 22    Section 125. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may   SB4109- 35 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 2Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to the 3Winnebago Health Department for all costs associated with 4healthcare access and availability, administrative costs and 5operational expenses. 6    Section 130. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 7be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 8Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to SIHF 9Healthcare for all costs associated with healthcare access and 10availability, administrative costs and operational expenses. 11    Section 135. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 13Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to CHCC 14Community Healthcare Clinic for all costs associated with 15healthcare access and availability, administrative costs and 16operational expenses. 17    Section 140. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 19Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to 20Christian Community Health Center for all costs associated 21with healthcare access and availability, administrative costs 22and operational expenses.   SB4109- 36 -OMB104 00205 TGT 10205 b1ARTICLE 32    Section 5. The sum of $9,005,269, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 4on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 5such purpose in Article 123, Section 230 of Public Act 6104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 7Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Fund to the Department of 8Public Health for all costs associated with response to the 9COVID-19 Pandemic. 10    Section 9999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 111, 2026.